South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Local funds for charter schools authorized SECTION 1. (A) The Jasper County Council is authorized, but is not required, to provide local funds from any revenue collected by the county including, but not limited to, revenues or fees received pursuant to a Fee-in-Lieu of Taxes (FILOT) agreement under Chapter 44, Title 12 of the South Carolina Code of Laws, on a per-pupil basis, as determined by the council, to any charter school in the county that: (1) provides in-person instruction at a physical location in the county; (2) has at least sixty percent of its student body classified as economically disadvantaged; (3) has its main campus located within thirty-five miles of a federal military installation; (4) has been in continuous operation in the county for at least five years; and (5) is in good financial standing with its authorizer. (B) For purposes of this act, Jasper County Council may, at its discretion, designate and allocate any county revenue source, including revenues otherwise distributable to the county under Section 12-44-50 or Section 12-44-80, or any successor provisions governing the distribution of FILOT fees, for allocation to eligible charter schools pursuant to subsection (A). Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 25th day of March, 2026. ______________________________________________________________________ President of the Senate _____________________________________________________________________ Speaker of the House of Representatives Approved the _____________ day of _________________________________________2026. ____________________________________________________________________ Governor ----XX----